Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 2
STUDENT OBLIGATIONS AND INSTITUTIONAL LOANS

23-3.1-201. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the availability of improved access to and choice of higher education opportunities in this state will benefit the residents of the state and that the establishment of a prepaid postsecondary education expense program will assist residents in meeting the expenses incurred in availing themselves of higher education opportunities. It is the intent of the general assembly in enacting this part 2 to create collegeinvest, which shall be a division within the department of higher education and which authority shall make or purchase student obligations and shall develop and administer a prepaid postsecondary education expense program. This part 2 shall be liberally construed to accomplish the intentions expressed in this section.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 812, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 623, § 15, effective April 10.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 421, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1268, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 560, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1428), ch. 390, p. 1830, § 5, effective June 9.

23-3.1-202. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Advance payment contract" means a contract entered into by the authority, as defined in subsection (2) of this section, and a purchaser in connection with the prepaid postsecondary education expense program as authorized in section 23-3.1-206.7.

"Authority" means collegeinvest, transferred to the department and existing as a division of the department pursuant to section 23-3.1-203.

"Board" means the board of directors of the authority.

"Bond" means any bond, note, debenture, interim certificate, or other evidence of indebtedness authorized to be issued by the authority pursuant to this part 2, including refunding bonds.

"Bond resolution" means the resolution authorizing the issuance of or providing the terms and conditions related to bonds issued pursuant to this part 2 and includes any trust agreement or trust indenture providing terms and conditions for such bonds.

"Collegeinvest" means:

The Colorado student obligation bond authority, as it existed prior to May 26, 2000, as an independent public body politic in accordance with section 23-3.1-203, as it existed prior to said date;

On and after May 26, 2000, but prior to July 1, 2004, the Colorado student obligation bond authority transferred to the department and existing as a division of the department pursuant to section 23-3.1-203, as it existed prior to said date;

On and after July 1, 2004, the successor to the Colorado student obligation bond authority existing as a division of the department pursuant to section 23-3.1-203, but designated and formally and legally known, as of July 1, 2004, as collegeinvest.

"Contract price" means the aggregate of all payment amounts to be remitted during the contract term by purchasers under the outstanding advance payment contracts as provided on the respective dates of execution thereof.

"Director" means the executive officer of collegeinvest, appointed in accordance with section 23-3.1-203.

"Excess amount" means the assets in the Colorado prepaid postsecondary education expense trust fund that the actuarial calculation under section 23-3.1-206.7 (5) demonstrates are in excess of the assets required to pay the obligations of the prepaid expense trust fund with a likelihood of such sufficiency of at least ninety-five percent.

"Executive director" means the executive director of the department of higher education.

"Executive officer" means the director of collegeinvest, transferred to the department and existing as a division of the department pursuant to section 23-3.1-203.

"Expected tuition units" means the total tuition units paid for and not distributed or refunded together with the portion of tuition units available for purchase under outstanding advance payment contracts that, based on an actuarial projection, are expected to be paid for and become obligations of the Colorado prepaid postsecondary education expense trust fund.

"Institutional loan" means a loan made by collegeinvest from bond proceeds, or other available moneys, to one or more institutions of higher education, to a nonprofit corporation acting on behalf of one or more institutions of higher education, to the division, or to purchasers, and made for the purpose of funding student obligations or payments to be made under advance payment contracts.

"Investable assets" means cash and cash equivalents on deposit in the prepaid expense trust fund and investments of amounts deposited to the prepaid expense trust fund.

"Prepaid expense program" means the Colorado prepaid postsecondary education expense program authorized in section 23-3.1-206.7.

"Prepaid expense trust fund" means the Colorado prepaid postsecondary education expense trust fund established by the authority in accordance with section 23-3.1-206.7 (5) and transferred on May 26, 2000, pursuant to section 23-3.1-206.7 (5).

"Purchaser" means a person who makes or is obligated to make a payment or payments in accordance with an advance payment contract on behalf of a qualified beneficiary.

"Qualified beneficiary" means a person identified in an advance payment contract as the recipient of moneys or benefits to be disbursed in accordance with an advance payment contract.

"State institution" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 23-3.3-101 (4).

"Student" means a student who, under rules promulgated by the division, is enrolled or accepted for enrollment at an institution of higher education and who is making suitable progress in his or her education toward obtaining a degree or other appropriate certification in accordance with standards promulgated by the division.

"Student obligations" means student obligation notes and other debt obligations evidencing loans made for higher education purposes, or to any person for the purposes of consolidating or refinancing loans for higher education purposes, which are either guaranteed student loans, educational loans, or loans eligible for consolidation or refinancing under Part B of Title IV of the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", as amended, which the authority may make, acquire, buy, sell, or endorse pursuant to this part 2, or which one or more institutions of higher education, or a nonprofit corporation acting on behalf of one or more institutions of higher education, or the division may make from or in anticipation of an institutional loan and which include a direct or indirect interest, in whole or part, of the notes or obligations.

"Tuition" means the quarter, semester, or term charges imposed by an institution of higher education and such fees or charges as may be included in the advance payment contract at the option of the authority.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 812, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(7) amended, p. 1090, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 84:

(1.5) and (4.5) added and (7) amended, p. 623, § 16, effective April 10.

L. 87:

(7) amended, p. 846, § 3, effective February 26.

L. 96:

(1) and (1.5) amended and (1.2), (4.2), (4.4), (5.1), (5.2), (5.3), (5.5), (5.6), (5.7), (5.8), (5.9), and (8) added, p. 421, § 2, effective April 22.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1268, § 2, effective May 26.

L. 2004:

Entire section R&RE, p. 560, § 6, effective July 1.

23-3.1-203. Authority - creation - membership - transfer of personnel.

Effective May 26, 2000, the authority shall be transferred to the department of higher education, and shall become a division thereof. Except as otherwise provided in this article, on and after May 26, 2000, the authority shall exercise its powers, duties, and functions under the department of higher education as if it were transferred by a type 2 transfer under the provisions of the "Administrative Organization Act of 1968", article 1 of title 24, C.R.S. The director shall be appointed by the executive director, shall function as the executive officer of the authority, and shall also be director of the student loan division. The director, with the approval of the executive director, shall employ such professional and clerical personnel as may be deemed necessary to carry out the duties and functions of the authority. Such personnel shall receive compensation for their services as determined by the director. The director and all personnel of the authority are declared to hold educational offices and to be exempt from the state personnel system.

Effective May 26, 2000, the board of directors of the authority, as it existed prior to May 26, 2000, shall be transferred with the authority to the department of higher education. The board continues to consist of nine members who are appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. Such members must be residents of the state. The term of office of each member is four years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than three members' terms expire in the same year. Each member shall serve until a successor has been appointed by the governor. Any member is eligible for reappointment. The governor shall fill any vacancy by appointment for the remainder of an unexpired term. Any member appointed by the governor when the general assembly is not in regular session, whether appointed for an unexpired term or for a full term, shall be deemed to be duly appointed and qualified until the appointment of such member is approved or rejected by the senate. Such appointment shall be submitted to the senate for its approval or rejection during the next regular session of the general assembly following the appointment.

Any member of the board appointed by the governor may be removed by the governor.

On and after July 1, 2004, the division of the department of higher education known prior to said date as the Colorado student obligation bond authority shall be formally and legally known as and designated collegeinvest.

On and after July 1, 2004, whenever the Colorado student obligation bond authority or the board of directors of the Colorado student obligation bond authority is referred to or designated by a contract or other document, such reference or designation shall be deemed to apply to collegeinvest as a division of the department of higher education pursuant to this section. All contracts entered into by or on behalf of the Colorado student obligation bond authority or its board prior to July 1, 2004, are hereby validated as obligations of collegeinvest.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 813, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(2) R&RE, p. 624, § 17, effective April 10.

L. 87:

(2)(a) amended, p. 906, § 13, effective June 15.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1271, § 3, effective May 26.

L. 2004:

(1) amended and (3) added, p. 563, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 513, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 30, § 38, effective February 25.

Cross references:

For limitation on issuance of private activity bonds, see part 17 of article 32 of title 24; for the provisions that designate the Colorado student obligation bond authority as a "special purpose authority" for the purposes of section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution, see § 24-77-102 (15).

23-3.1-204. Organizational meeting - chairperson - conflict of interest.

On or before July 15, 2000, a member of the board, designated by the governor, shall call and convene the initial organizational meeting of the board after transfer of the authority to the department and shall serve as its chairperson pro tempore. At such meeting, appropriate bylaws shall be presented for adoption. The bylaws may provide for the delegation of certain powers and duties and such other matters as the authority deems proper. At such meeting, and annually thereafter, the board shall elect one of its members as chairperson and one as vice-chairperson.

The director or any other person designated by the board shall keep a record of the proceedings of the board and shall be custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed with the board and the minute books or journal of the board. Said director or other person may cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the board and may give certificates to the effect that such copies are true copies and all persons dealing with the authority may rely on such certificates.

The board may delegate to one or more of its members or to its director such powers and duties as it may deem proper and to its director or any other person designated by the board, the power to fix the interest rates of any particular issue, subject to such limitations as shall be prescribed by the board.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 563, § 8, effective July 1, 2004.)

Any member of the board shall disqualify himself or herself from voting on any issue in which he or she has a conflict of interest unless such member has disclosed such conflict of interest in compliance with section 18-8-308, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 813, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(3) amended and (5) R&RE, pp. 624, 625, §§ 18, 19, effective April 10.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1272, § 4, effective May 26.

L. 2004:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 563, § 8, effective July 1.

23-3.1-205. Meetings of board - quorum - expenses.

Five members of the board shall constitute a quorum. Action may be taken by the board upon the affirmative vote of a majority of the members present at any meeting at which a quorum is present. No vacancy in the membership of the board shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the board.

Pursuant to part 4 of article 6 of title 24, C.R.S., each meeting of the board shall be open to the public. Notice of meetings shall be as provided in accordance with applicable law. One or more members of the board may participate in any board meeting and may vote on resolutions through the usage of telecommunications devices, including, but not limited to, the usage of a conference telephone or similar communications equipment. Such participation through telecommunications devices shall constitute presence in person at such meeting. Such use of telecommunications shall not supersede any requirements for public hearing otherwise provided by law. Resolutions need not be published or posted, but resolutions and all proceedings and other acts of the board shall be a public record.

Members of the board shall receive no compensation for services but shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including traveling and lodging expenses, incurred in the discharge of their official duties. Any payments for expenses shall be paid from funds of the authority.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 814, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 785, § 1, effective April 29.

L. 84:

(1) amended, p. 625, § 20, effective April 10.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 901, § 2, effective April 19; (2) amended, p. 820, § 4, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1273, § 5, effective May 26.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 564, § 9, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (2) in Senate Bill 91-33 and House Bill 91-1119 were harmonized.

23-3.1-205.3. Transfer of property.

On May 26, 2000, all items of property, real and personal, including office furniture and fixtures, books, documents, funds and accounts, and records of the authority shall be transferred with the authority to the department of higher education, and shall remain the property of the authority.

Amounts in the existing administrative fund of the authority transferred on May 26, 2000, shall be deposited as provided in section 23-3.1-205.4. Funds of the authority held by a corporate trustee pursuant to a trust indenture shall continue to be held and invested in accordance with such trust indenture. The prepaid tuition expense fund shall be transferred to be held by the state treasury and shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of this part 2.

On and after May 26, 2000, whenever the Colorado student obligation bond authority or the board of directors of the Colorado student obligation bond authority is referred to or designated by any contract or other document or in other state statutory provisions, such reference or designation shall be deemed to apply to the authority as a division of the department of higher education pursuant to section 23-3.1-203. All contracts entered into by or on behalf of the Colorado student obligation bond authority or its board prior to May 26, 2000, are hereby validated, with the authority in the department of higher education succeeding to all rights and assuming all obligations under such contracts.

No suit, action, or other judicial or administrative proceeding lawfully commenced prior to May 26, 2000, or that could have been commenced prior to said date, by or against the Colorado student obligation bond authority, its board of directors, or any officer thereof in such officer's official capacity or in relation to the discharge of the official's duties shall abate by reason of the transfer of the authority and its board to the department of higher education.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1274, § 6, effective May 26.

L. 2004:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 564, § 10, effective July 1.

23-3.1-205.4. Collegeinvest fund - creation - control - use.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the Colorado student obligation bond authority fund, to be known and referred to on and after July 1, 2004, as the collegeinvest fund, which shall be under the control of the authority in accordance with the provisions of this part 2 and part 3 of this article. The moneys in the collegeinvest fund shall be invested by the state treasurer. Except as otherwise allowed by section 24-36-103 (2), C.R.S., and except for amounts received in connection with the prepaid expense program and the savings programs in part 3 of this article, all moneys received or acquired by the authority, whether by appropriation, grant, contract, gift, sale or lease of surplus real or personal property, or any other means, whose disposition is not otherwise provided for by law or by a trust indenture, and all interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to said fund, including moneys received pursuant to sections 23-3.1-206 (1)(k) and 23-3.1-304 (1)(h). Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), the moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the authority and shall remain in the fund and shall not be transferred or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of any fiscal year.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), if the authority sells, transfers, or enters into a contract with another entity concerning all or a substantial portion of the authority's power to make, originate, disburse, or service loans, the proceeds of the sale, transfer, or contract shall not be used by the authority without further appropriation by the general assembly.

Notwithstanding any provision of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) to the contrary, if the authority or any other division of the department sells, transfers, or enters into a contract with another entity concerning all or any portion of the authority's or division's interest in any student loans or student obligations, the authority or the division shall deposit the net proceeds of the sale, transfer, or contract as follows:

Up to five million dollars shall remain in the reserve account in the collegeinvest fund, which account is hereby created, and may be used: To fund the repurchase of student loans sold by the authority if a guarantee agency refuses to honor a claim filed with respect to any such loans on account of an event that occurred prior to the sale; and to pay all liabilities, costs, and expenses with respect to the authority's programs to undertake forgiveness of indebtedness under such student loans sold by the authority.

After the retention of the amount required in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c), up to five million dollars of the remaining proceeds shall remain in the transition account in the collegeinvest fund, which account is hereby created to pay costs and expenses associated with the transition and wind-down of the authority's student loan program. Any expenditure from the transition account in excess of one hundred thousand dollars shall require the approval of the executive director.

to (IV) Repealed.

The moneys in the collegeinvest fund may be used by the authority for the payment of salaries and operating and administrative expenses of the authority and for the payment of any other expenses incurred by the authority in carrying out its statutory powers and duties.

The moneys in the collegeinvest fund that are not needed for immediate use by the authority may be invested by the state treasurer in investments authorized by sections 24-36-109, 24-36-112, and 24-36-113, C.R.S. The authority shall determine the amount of moneys in the fund that may be invested and shall notify the state treasurer in writing of such amount.

The authority may request authorization to transfer or loan moneys from the collegeinvest fund to the prepaid expense trust fund, created in section 23-3.1-206.7, or to any fund created for the implementation of the savings programs, established pursuant to part 3 of this article, as necessary to carry out the authority's powers and duties under this part 2 and part 3 of this article. The authority shall submit any such transfer or loan request to the executive director for approval. The authority shall not transfer or loan moneys from the collegeinvest fund to the prepaid expense trust fund or to any fund created for the implementation of the savings programs unless such transfer or loan is approved by the executive director.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1274, § 6, effective May 26.

L. 2003:

(4) added, p. 552, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 564, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 514, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 203, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1)(c) and (1)(c)(III.5) added and (1)(c)(IV) amended, (HB 10-1428), ch. 390, p. 1828, 1831, §§ 2, 10, effective June 9.

L. 2014:

(1)(c)(III.5) repealed and (1)(c)(IV) amended, (HB 14-1363), ch. 302, p. 1266, § 18, effective May 31; (1)(c)(I) and (1)(c)(II) amended and (1)(c)(III) and (1)(c)(IV) repealed, (HB 14-1384), ch. 347, p. 1559, § 4, effective August 6.

L. 2015:

(1)(a) and (4) amended, (HB 15-1359), ch. 269, p. 1054, § 14, effective June 3.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1)(c)(IV) was amended in HB 14-1363. Those amendments were superseded by the repeal of subsection (1)(c)(IV) in HB 14-1384.

23-3.1-205.5. Collegeinvest - enterprise status.

Collegeinvest shall constitute an enterprise for the purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, so long as collegeinvest retains the ability to issue revenue bonds and receives less than ten percent of its total annual revenues in grants, as defined in section 24-77-102 (7), C.R.S., from all Colorado state and local governments combined. So long as it constitutes an enterprise pursuant to this subsection (1), collegeinvest shall not be subject to any provisions of section 20 of article X of the state constitution. Agreements between collegeinvest and the student loan division in the department of higher education for the guarantee of payment of student loans are not grants for purposes of the definition of enterprise under section 20 (2)(d) of article X of the state constitution.

For purposes of part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S., the records of collegeinvest and the board shall be public records, as defined in section 24-72-202 (6), C.R.S., except to the extent otherwise specified by law, regardless of whether collegeinvest and the board constitute an enterprise pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1274, § 6, effective May 26.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 565, § 12, effective July 1.

23-3.1-205.7. Department of higher education - executive director - powers and duties.

In addition to any other powers and duties specifically granted by law, the executive director shall have such powers and duties as are not otherwise granted to the authority in this part 2 and in part 3 of this article, and shall also have all powers and duties necessary to oversee the authority, including, but not limited to, its management and direction.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1274, § 6, effective May 26.

23-3.1-206. General powers and duties of the authority.

In addition to any other powers and duties specifically granted to the authority in this part 2, the authority has the following powers:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1276, § 7, effective May 26, 2000.)

To adopt and from time to time amend or repeal policies for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business, consistent with the provisions of this part 2;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1276 § 7, effective May 26, 2000.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1276 § 7, effective May 26, 2000.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1276 § 7, effective May 26, 2000.)

To borrow money and issue bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, or other obligations and to fund or refund such obligations as provided in this part 2;

To engage the services of private consultants and legal counsel and to otherwise contract with providers to render professional and technical assistance, advice, and other services in carrying out the purposes of this part 2 and part 3 of this article without regard to the provisions of the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, C.R.S.;

Repealed.

To purchase or participate in the purchase of student obligations;

To sell or participate in the sale of student obligations;

To collect and pay reasonable fees and charges in connection with making, purchasing, originating, disbursing, and servicing or causing to be made, purchased, originated, disbursed, or serviced student obligations or institutional loans by the authority, including payment to the division for services performed for the authority and pursuant to part 3 of this article without regard to the provisions of the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, C.R.S.;

To procure insurance, guarantees, or other credit support with respect to all student obligations made or purchased or all institutional loans made by the authority;

To consent, whenever it deems it necessary or desirable in the fulfillment of its purposes, to the modification of the rate of interest, time of payment of any installment of principal or interest, or any other terms of any student obligation to which the authority is a party, but no such consent shall be made or given if its effect would be to obviate insurance coverage with respect to any student obligation;

To make and execute contracts, including advance payment contracts with purchasers and all other instruments necessary or convenient for the exercise of its powers and functions under this part 2;

To do all things necessary and convenient to carry out the purposes of this part 2 and of part 3 of this article including funding of grants, scholarships, and loan forgiveness;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1276, § 7, effective May 26, 2000.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1276, § 7, effective May 26, 2000.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1276, § 7, effective May 26, 2000.)

To establish policies, procedures, and criteria to implement and administer the prepaid expense program;

To assure that nothing shall cause the authority to exceed the limitations prescribed in section

23-3.1-205.5

;

At times prescribed by the department of revenue, but not less frequently than annually, to certify to the department of revenue information regarding persons who owe a loan repayment to the division, the amount of which has been determined to be owing as a result of a final agency determination or judicial decision pursuant to

39-21-108 (3)

, C.R.S., or which has been reduced to judgment.

Such information shall include the name and social security number of the person owing the debt, the amount of the debt, and any other identifying information required by the department of revenue.

Upon notification by the department of revenue of amounts deposited with the state treasurer pursuant to section

39-21-108 (3)

, C.R.S., the state treasurer shall disburse such amounts to the division.

To implement and administer, including marketing, the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship program established in section

23-3.1-206.9

;

To deposit moneys into the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship trust fund; to accept moneys appropriated to the fund by the general assembly; to accept gifts, grants, and donations from third parties for deposit into the fund; and to expend moneys from the fund for Colorado collegeinvest scholarships;

To organize entities pursuant to title 7, C.R.S., and transfer funds to the entities for the purpose of investing the moneys in the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship trust fund and any other trusts and funds under the authority's control; and

To develop and administer loan forgiveness programs.

No actions taken by the authority pursuant to this section shall be interpreted to constitute or become an indebtedness, a debt, or a liability of the state, nor shall any actions taken by the authority be interpreted to constitute the giving, pledging, or loaning of the full faith and credit of the state.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 815, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1)(h) to (1)(l) amended, p. 625, § 21, effective April 10.

L. 96:

(1)(g) and (1)(n) amended and (1)(p) to (1)(s) added, p. 423, § 3, effective April 22.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1276, § 7, effective May 26.

L. 2002:

(1)(u) added, p. 101, § 5, effective August 7.

L. 2004:

(1)(h), (1)(k), and (1)(l) amended, p. 566, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(x) amended, p. 1017, § 13, effective June 2; (1)(t) amended and (1)(v), (1)(w), and (1)(x) added, p. 168, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(g), (1)(k), (1)(o), (1)(v), (1)(w), and (1)(x) amended and (1)(y) added, p. 203, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1)(o) amended, (HB 10-1428), ch. 390, p. 1830, § 7, effective June 9; (1)(h) repealed, (HB 10-1428), ch. 390, p. 1830, § 6, effective September 30.

L. 2011:

(1)(y) amended, (HB 11-1281), ch. 180, p. 689, § 13, effective May 19.

23-3.1-206.2. Financial need scholarships and grants - fund - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1428), ch. 390, p. 1829, § 3, effective June 9.

L. 2014:

(3) added, (HB 14-1384), ch. 347, p. 1559, § 3, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective September 1, 2014. (See L. 2014, p. 1559.)

23-3.1-206.5. Servicing of student obligations and institutional loans.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 566, § 14, effective July 1, 2004.)

The authority may contract with the division to service student obligations made or purchased by the authority.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 625, § 22, effective April 10.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 566, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (HB 10-1428), ch. 390, p. 1831, § 8, effective June 9.

23-3.1-206.7. Prepaid expense program.

The authority shall develop and administer, in accordance with this part 2, the Colorado prepaid postsecondary education expense program, which program is hereby created. Through the prepaid expense program, all or part of tuition or other costs, as determined by the authority, may be paid in advance of or accumulated toward enrollment at institutions of higher education.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1278, § 8, effective May 26, 2000.)

No purchaser or qualified beneficiary participating in the prepaid expense program shall be classified as a resident for tuition purposes as a result of such participation. Purchasers and qualified beneficiaries shall be required to establish residency status based on the requirements of the state institution at which the qualified beneficiary is seeking to enroll.

The selection by a purchaser in an advance payment contract of a particular state institution shall not in any way constitute a promise or guarantee that a qualified beneficiary will be admitted to any particular state institution or other institution of higher education or allowed to continue enrollment in or graduate from any state institution or other institution of higher education.

The Colorado prepaid postsecondary education expense trust fund is hereby created. The prepaid expense trust fund shall consist of moneys remitted by purchasers, moneys acquired from governmental and private sources, and general fund appropriations, if any. In addition, the prepaid expense trust fund may include any moneys transferred or loaned thereto pursuant to section

23-3.1-205.4

. All income derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the prepaid expense trust fund shall be credited to the fund. At the end of any fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered moneys in the prepaid expense trust fund shall remain therein and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund. On May 26, 2000, the prepaid expense trust fund, and all moneys in said fund, including all interest and earnings in said fund shall be transferred with the authority as provided in section

23-3.1-205.3

. All moneys remitted by purchasers and other moneys received by the authority in connection with the prepaid expense program shall be transmitted by the authority to the state treasurer and credited to the prepaid expense trust fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the prepaid expense trust fund based upon the direction of the authority and shall make disbursements from the prepaid expense trust fund in connection with the prepaid expense program based upon the direction of the authority and in a manner appropriate to carry out the prepaid expense program. All income derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the prepaid expense trust fund shall be credited to the fund. At the end of any fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered moneys in the prepaid expense trust fund shall remain therein and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1278, § 8, effective May 26, 2000.)

The state treasurer shall maintain on behalf of the authority the prepaid expense trust fund as a separate fund. The state treasurer shall credit all moneys remitted to the state treasurer by the authority as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) to the prepaid expense trust fund.

The authority shall evaluate the actuarial soundness of the prepaid expense trust fund if, on the last day of the fiscal year, the aggregate amount of moneys of the prepaid expense trust fund invested in any of the following forms of investment exceeds ten percent of the market value of investable assets of the prepaid expense trust fund:

Common or preferred stock; or

Corporate bonds, notes, or debentures that are convertible into common or preferred stock; or

Investment trust shares.

The authority may contract with a private consultant or consultants to perform an actuarial evaluation of the prepaid expense trust fund and to provide financial advice to the authority in connection with the prepaid expense trust fund. Any actuarial report and written financial advice shall be provided by the authority to the state treasurer. If, based upon an actuarial evaluation, the authority determines that the prepaid expense trust fund is not actuarially sound, the authority may direct the state treasurer to distribute the available assets of the prepaid expense trust fund in a manner permitted by outstanding advance payment contracts. In connection with the evaluation of the prepaid expense trust fund, a calculation based on key assumptions approved by the board shall be made by or on behalf of the authority to determine whether an excess amount exists in the prepaid expense trust fund. If, based on this calculation, the authority determines that an excess amount exists in the prepaid expense trust fund, the authority shall calculate, by dividing such excess amount by the total number of expected tuition units in the prepaid expense trust fund, the portion of such excess amount that would be attributable on a pro rata basis to each such expected tuition unit. At the time the value of any tuition units under an advance payment contract is disbursed from the prepaid expense trust fund during the academic year immediately following such calculation, the portion of the excess amount attributable to such tuition units as a result of the calculation made pursuant to this paragraph (d) shall be paid as part of such disbursement. The excess amount shall otherwise remain in the prepaid expense trust fund as a part of the stabilization reserve.

All expenses of the authority incurred in developing and administering the prepaid expense program shall be payable from the prepaid expense trust fund. The authority may use moneys in the prepaid expense trust fund to reimburse the expenses of the authority incurred in connection with the development and administration of the prepaid expense program. In no event shall annual administration expenses of the authority exceed one percent of the contract price. Any recovery of development costs by the authority shall not include interest or finance charges, but may include moneys transferred from the collegeinvest fund to the prepaid expense trust fund under section

23-3.1-205.4 (4)

. Any moneys in the prepaid expense trust fund that are not needed for immediate use by the authority shall be invested by the state treasurer in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) and with the actuarial report provided by the authority and in investments permitted by section

23-3.1-216 (1)

and (3). The authority shall determine the amount of moneys in the fund that shall be invested and shall notify the state treasurer in writing of the amount.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1278, § 8, effective May 26, 2000.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1278, § 8, effective May 26, 2000.)

If, at any time, the authority determines that the prepaid expense program, or any aspect thereof, is not financially sound, the authority may discontinue permanently or for a period of time the prepaid expense program or that particular aspect of the program and the execution of additional advance payment contracts. The state treasurer shall continue to invest moneys in the prepaid expense trust fund based upon the direction of the authority and shall continue to make disbursements from the prepaid expense trust fund in connection with the prepaid expense program based upon the direction of the authority for the benefit of existing purchasers and qualified beneficiaries except as otherwise authorized.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 423, § 4, effective April 22.

L. 98:

(5)(a) amended, p. 213, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1278, § 8, effective May 26.

L. 2003:

(5)(a) amended, p. 553, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2004:

(1), (5)(a), (5)(d), and (8) amended, p. 566, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(5)(e)(I) amended, p. 204, § 3, effective August 5.